Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1542.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 11, Chapter 366, O.S.L.


2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 20K), is amended to read as


follows:


Section 20K. A. Upon the effective date of this act On or


after January 1, 2026, Class B6 shall include the following criminal


offenses:


1. Striking, tormenting, mistreating, or administering a


nonpoisonous desensitizing substance to a police dog or police



Req. No. 2510 Page 1


horse, as provided for in subsection A of Section 649.1 of Title 21


of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


2. Interfering with the lawful performance of a police dog or


police horse, as provided for in subsection B of Section 649.1 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


3. Harming, torturing, injuring, disabling, or otherwise


mistreating or killing a service animal during the commission of a


misdemeanor or felony offense, as provided for in subsection D of


Section 649.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


4. Assault, battery, or assault and battery upon a Department


of Corrections employee by a person in the custody of the Department


of Corrections, as provided for in subsection A of Section 650.2 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


5. Assault, battery, or assault and battery upon an employee of


a private prison contractor by a person incarcerated in an


institution operated by a private prison contractor, as provided for


in subsection B of Section 650.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes this title;


6. Aggravated assault and battery upon a Department of Human


Services employee or contractor, as provided for in subsection C of


Section 650.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


7. Assault, battery, or assault and battery upon an employee of


the Office of Juvenile Affairs by a person in the custody of the



Req. No. 2510 Page 2


Office of Juvenile Affairs, as provided for in subsection D of


Section 650.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


8. Assault, battery, or assault and battery upon a medical care


provider, as provided for in Section 650.4 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title;


9. Assault, battery, or assault and battery upon an officer of


the court, witness, or juror, as provided for in subsection B of


Section 650.6 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


10. Aggravated assault and battery upon a school employee, as


provided for in subsection C of Section 650.7 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title;


11. Assault, battery, or assault and battery upon an employee


of a facility maintained by the Office of Juvenile Affairs, a


facility maintained by a private contractor, juvenile detention


center, or juvenile bureau, as provided for in Section 650.8 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


12. Throwing, transferring, or placing any feces, urine, semen,


saliva, or blood upon an employee of the state, a county, or a city,


as provided for in Section 650.9 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes this title;


13. Medical battery, as provided for in Section 650.11 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes this title; and


14. Child endangerment, as provided for in Section 852.1 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title; and

Req. No. 2510 Page 3


15. Stalking as provided for in subsection A of Section 1173 of


this title.


B. Any person convicted of a Class B6 criminal offense set


forth in this section shall be punished in accordance with the


corresponding penalties provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1173, as


last amended by Section 1, Chapter 145, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 1173), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1173. A. Any person who willfully, maliciously, and


repeatedly follows or harasses another person in a manner that:


1. Would cause a reasonable person or a member of the immediate


family of that person, as defined in subsection F of this section,


to feel frightened, intimidated, threatened, harassed, or molested;


and


2. Actually causes the person being followed or harassed to


feel terrorized, frightened, intimidated, threatened, harassed, or


molested,


shall, upon conviction, be guilty of the crime of stalking, which is


a Class B6 felony offense punishable by imprisonment in the custody


of the Department of Corrections for a term not to exceed three (3)


years, or by a fine not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00),


or by both such fine imprisonment and imprisonment fine. Any person


convicted of a second violation of the provisions of this subsection


shall be punished by imprisonment in the custody of the Department

Req. No. 2510 Page 4


of Corrections for a term not to exceed six (6) years, or by a fine


not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or by both such


fine imprisonment and imprisonment fine. Any person convicted of a


third or subsequent violation of the provisions of this subsection


shall be punished by imprisonment in the custody of the Department


of Corrections for a term not to exceed twelve (12) years, or by a


fine not to exceed Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), or by both


such fine imprisonment and imprisonment fine.


B. Any person who violates the provisions of subsection A of


this section when:


1. There is a permanent or temporary restraining order, a


protective order, an emergency ex parte protective order, or an


injunction in effect prohibiting the behavior described in


subsection A of this section against the same party, when the person


violating the provisions of subsection A of this section has actual


notice of the issuance of such order or injunction;


2. Said Such person is on probation or parole, a condition of


which prohibits the behavior described in subsection A of this


section against the same party or under the conditions of a


community or alternative punishment; or


3. Said Such person, within ten (10) years preceding the


violation of subsection A of this section, completed the execution


of sentence for a conviction of a crime involving the use or threat



Req. No. 2510 Page 5


of violence against the same party, or against any member of the


immediate family of such party,


shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class B5 felony offense


punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of


Corrections for a term not to exceed fifteen (15) years, or by a


fine not to exceed Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00), or by both


such fine imprisonment and imprisonment fine.


C. Any person who:


1. Commits a second act of stalking within ten (10) years of


the completion of sentence for a prior conviction of stalking; or


2. Has a prior conviction of stalking and, after being served


with a protective order that prohibits contact with an individual,


knowingly makes unconsented contact with the same individual,


shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class B5 felony offense


punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of


Corrections for a term not to exceed twenty (20) years, or by a fine


not to exceed Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00), or by both


such fine imprisonment and imprisonment fine.


D. Any person who commits an act of stalking within ten (10)


years of the completion of execution of sentence for a prior


conviction under subsection B or C of this section shall, upon


conviction, be guilty of a Class B4 felony offense punishable by


imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a


term not to exceed twenty-five (25) years, or by a fine not to

Req. No. 2510 Page 6


exceed Thirty Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00), or by both such fine


imprisonment and imprisonment fine.


E. Evidence that the defendant continued to engage in a course


of conduct involving repeated unconsented contact, as defined in


subsection F of this section, with the victim after having been


requested by the victim to discontinue the same or any other form of


unconsented contact, and to refrain from any further unconsented


contact with the victim, shall give rise to a rebuttable presumption


that the continuation of the course of conduct caused the victim to


feel terrorized, frightened, intimidated, threatened, harassed, or


molested.


F. For purposes of determining the crime of stalking, the


following definitions shall apply:


1. “Harasses” means a pattern or course of conduct directed


toward another individual that includes, but is not limited to,


repeated or continuing unconsented contact, that would cause a


reasonable person to suffer emotional distress, and that actually


causes emotional distress to the victim. Harassment shall include


harassing or obscene phone calls as prohibited by Section 1172 of


this title and conduct prohibited by Section 850 of this title.


Harassment does not include constitutionally protected activity or


conduct that serves a legitimate purpose;





Req. No. 2510 Page 7


2. “Course of conduct” means a series of two or more separate


acts over a period of time, however short or long, evidencing a


continuity of purpose, including any of the following:


a. maintaining a visual or physical proximity to the


victim,


b. approaching or confronting the victim in a public


place or on private property,


c. appearing at the workplace of the victim or contacting


the employer or coworkers of the victim,


d. appearing at the home of the victim or contacting the


neighbors of the victim,


e. entering onto or remaining on property owned, leased,


or occupied by the victim,


f. contacting the victim by telephone, text message,


electronic message, electronic mail, or other means of


electronic communication or causing the telephone or


electronic device of the victim or the telephone or


electronic device of any other person to ring or


generate notifications repeatedly or continuously,


regardless of whether a conversation ensues,


g. photographing, videotaping, audiotaping, or, through


any other electronic means, monitoring or recording


the activities of the victim. This subparagraph


applies regardless of where the act occurs,

Req. No. 2510 Page 8


h. sending to the victim any physical or electronic


material or contacting the victim by any means,


including any message, comment, or other content


posted on any Internet site or web application,


i. sending to a family member or member of the household


of the victim, or any current or former employer of


the victim, or any current or former coworker of the


victim, or any friend of the victim, any physical or


electronic material or contacting such person by any


means, including any message, comment, or other


content posted on any Internet site or web


application, for the purpose of obtaining information


about, disseminating information about, or


communicating with the victim,


j. placing an object on or delivering an object to


property owned, leased, or occupied by the victim,


k. delivering an object to a family member or member of


the household of the victim, or an employer, coworker,


or friend of the victim, or placing an object on, or


delivering an object to, property owned, leased, or


occupied by such a person with the intent that the


object be delivered to the victim, or





Req. No. 2510 Page 9


l. causing a person to engage in any of the acts


described in subparagraphs a through k of this


paragraph.


Constitutionally protected activity is not included within the


meaning of “course course of conduct” conduct;


3. “Emotional distress” means significant mental suffering or


distress that may, but does not necessarily require, medical or


other professional treatment or counseling;


4. “Unconsented contact” means any contact with another


individual that is initiated or continued without the consent of the


individual, or in disregard of that individual’s expressed desire


that the contact be avoided or discontinued. Constitutionally


protected activity is not included within the meaning of unconsented


contact. Unconsented contact includes, but is not limited to, any


of the following:


a. following or appearing within the sight of that


individual,


b. approaching or confronting that individual in a public


place or on private property,


c. appearing at the workplace or residence of that


individual,


d. entering onto or remaining on property owned, leased,


or occupied by that individual,


e. contacting that individual by telephone,

Req. No. 2510 Page 10


f. sending mail or electronic communications to that


individual, and


g. placing an object on, or delivering an object to,


property owned, leased, or occupied by that


individual;


5. “Member of the immediate family”, for the purposes of this


section, means any spouse, parent, child, person related within the


third degree of consanguinity or affinity, or any other person who


regularly resides in the household or who regularly resided in the


household within the prior six (6) months; and


6. a. “Following” shall include the tracking of the movement


or location of an individual through the use of a


Global Positioning System (GPS) device or other


monitoring device by a person, or person who acts on


behalf of another, without the consent of the


individual whose movement or location is being


tracked; provided, this shall not apply to the lawful


use of a GPS device or other monitoring device or to


the use by a new or used motor vehicle dealer or other


motor vehicle creditor of a GPS device or other


monitoring device, including a device containing


technology used to remotely disable the ignition of a


motor vehicle, in connection with lawful action after


default of the terms of a motor vehicle credit sale,

Req. No. 2510 Page 11


loan or lease, and with the express written consent of


the owner or lessee of the motor vehicle.


b. Following shall not include the use of a GPS or other


monitoring device by an employer, whether public or


private, to track employer owned or leased vehicles.


G. Any pleas of guilty or nolo contendere or finding of guilt


to a violation of any provision of this section shall constitute a


conviction of the offense for the purpose of any subsection of this


section under which the existence of a prior conviction is relevant


for a period of ten (10) years following the completion of any


sentence or court imposed probationary term.


SECTION 3. REPEALER 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1173, as last


amended by Section 118, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 1173), is hereby repealed.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2510 CN 1/12/2026 4:23:25 PM















Req. No. 2510 Page 12